Massachusetts, session 194th, S1228.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 52 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 69
of the Acts of 2018, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Delinquent child” and
inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
“Delinquent child”, a child between 10 and 18 years of age who commits any offense
against a law of the commonwealth; provided, however, that such offense shall not include a
civil infraction, a violation of any municipal ordinance or town by-law or a first offense of a
misdemeanor for which the punishment is a fine, imprisonment in a jail or house of correction
for not more than 6 months or both such fine and imprisonment.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 54 of said chapter 119, as amended by chapter 69 of the Acts of
2018, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 2, the figure “12” and inserting in place thereof
the following figure:- 10.
SECTION 3. This act shall go into effect immediately upon its passage.
of 2